Massachusetts, session 194th, H5514.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1.
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, including the provisions of
Chapter 43 of the Acts of 2007, the City of Boston Police Department shall waive the maximum
age requirement for original appointment of police officers for Jorge Enriquez. If Jorge Enriquez
meets all other requirements set forth by the Boston Police Department, he shall be eligible to
have his name certified for original appointment to the position of police officer.
Section 2.
The provisions of this act shall take effect immediately upon passage.
of 1